North Carolina, session 2025, HB154.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. NCInnovation shall, as if the General Assembly, by this act, dissolved
it pursuant to Chapter 55A of the General Statutes, transfer back to the State, after consultation
with, and in conformity with direction received from, the State Controller, (i) all funds, other
than excluded amounts and interest earned on excluded amounts, and (ii) all assets acquired with
State funds.
SECTION 2. The State Controller shall facilitate the return of transferred funds and
assets from NCInnovation pursuant to Section 1 of this act and shall deposit such funds into the
General Fund.
SECTION 3. The transfer and deposit of funds in the General Fund pursuant to
Section 2 of this act does not constitute an "appropriation made by law," as that phrase is used in
Section 7(1) of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution. The funds shall remain
unappropriated unless the General Assembly appropriates the funds in a subsequent act of the
General Assembly.
SECTION 4. Effective 60 days after this act becomes law, Article 76A of Chapter
143 of the General Statutes is repealed.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H154-v-1*